Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1258
Water skis, surfboard, or similar device; observation required.

No person shall operate a vessel on any waters of this state for towing a person or persons on water skis, surfboard, or similar device unless there is in such vessel a person, in addition to the operator, in a position to observe the progress of the person or persons being towed, except that this section shall not apply to any motorboat equipped with a wide-angle, rearview mirror.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 58.